th: เซ็นเซอร์จอดรถเสร็จสิ้น: โครเมียม; เงางาม; ด้าน; ซาติน; มีพื้นผิว; อื่นๆ
tr: Park sensörü yüzey kaplaması: Krom; Parlak; Mat; Saten; Dokulu; Diğer
vi: Cảm biến đỗ xe hoàn tất: Mạ crom; Bóng; Nhám; Satin; Có vân; Khác
nb: Parkeringssensorens finish: Krom; Blank; Matt; Sateng; Teksturert; Annet
hu: Parkolószenzor felületkialakítása: Króm; Fényes; Matt; Szatén; Texturált; Egyéb
bg-BG: Покритие на паркинг сензора: Хром; Гланцирано; Матово; Сатен; Текстурирано; Друго
de: Oberflächenbeschaffenheit des Parksensors: Chrom; Glänzend; Matt; Satiniert; Texturiert; Sonstige
zh-TW: 停車感測器表面處理: 鍍鉻; 亮面; 霧面; 緞面; 紋理; 其他
nl: Parkeersensor afwerking: Chroom; Glanzend; Mat; Zijdeglans; Met textuur; Overig
ru: Отделка датчика парковки: Хром; Глянцевая; Матовая; Сатиновая; Текстурированная; Другое
pt-BR: Acabamento do sensor de estacionamento: Cromado; Brilhante; Fosco; Acetinado; Texturizado; Outro
da: Parkeringssensorens finish: Krom; Blank; Mat; Satin; Tekstureret; Anden
it: Finitura del sensore di parcheggio: Cromato; Lucido; Opaco; Satinato; Testurizzato; Altro
zh-CN: 驻车传感器表面处理: 镀铬; 亮面; 哑光; 缎面; 纹理面; 其他
en: Parking sensor finish: Chrome; Glossy; Matte; Satin; Textured; Other
fr: Finition du capteur de stationnement: Chromé; Brillant; Mat; Satiné; Texturé; Autre
es: Acabado del sensor de estacionamiento: Cromado; Brillante; Mate; Satinado; Texturizado; Otro
ro-RO: Finisajul senzorului de parcare: Cromat; Lucios; Mat; Satinat; Texturat; Altele
sv: Parkeringssensorns ytbehandling: Krom; Blank; Matt; Satin; Texturerad; Övrigt
pt-PT: Sensor de estacionamento finalizado: Cromado; Brilhante; Mate; Acetinado; Texturizado; Outro
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava parkovacieho senzora: Chróm; Lesklý; Matný; Saténový; So štruktúrou; Iné
pl: Wykończenie czujnika parkowania: Chromowane; Błyszczące; Matowe; Satynowe; Teksturowane; Inne
fi: Pysäköintitutkan viimeistely: Kromi; Kiiltävä; Matta; Satiini; Teksturoitu; Muu
hr-HR: Završna obrada parkirnog senzora: Krom; Sjajno; Mat; Saten; Teksturirano; Ostalo
ko: 주차 센서 마감: 크롬; 유광; 무광; 새틴; 질감 처리; 기타
sl-SI: Površinska obdelava parkirnega senzorja: Krom; Sijajni; Matirani; Satenasti; Teksturirani; Drugo
el: Φινίρισμα αισθητήρα στάθμευσης: Χρώμιο; Γυαλιστερό; Ματ; Σατινέ; Ανάγλυφο; Άλλο
lt-LT: Parkavimo jutiklio apdaila: Chromas; Blizgi; Matinė; Satininė; Tekstūruota; Kita
ja: パーキングセンサー仕上げ: クローム; 光沢; マット; サテン; テクスチャ; その他
cs: Povrchová úprava parkovacího senzoru: Chromované; Lesklé; Matné; Saténové; Texturované; Jiné